Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 11 Suspension or Revocation of Licenses — Violations

31-11-1.
Authority of division of motor vehicles to cancel license.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to cancel any operator’s or chauffeur’s license upon determining that the licensee was not entitled to its issuance pursuant to this title or that the licensee failed to give the required or correct information in his or her application, or committed any fraud in making the application.

Upon the cancellation, the licensee must surrender the cancelled license to the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-1

0; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-1

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-2.
Driving privileges of nonresidents.

The privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the highways of this state given to a nonresident pursuant to this title shall be subject to suspension or revocation by the division of motor vehicles in the same manner and for the same cause as an operator’s or chauffeur’s license issued pursuant to this title may be suspended or revoked.

The division of motor vehicles is further authorized, upon receiving a record of the conviction in this state of a nonresident driver of a motor vehicle of any offense under the motor vehicle laws of this state, to forward a certified copy of the record to the motor vehicle administrator in the state where the convicted person is a resident.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-11

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-3.
Resident’s conviction in another state.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to suspend or revoke the license of any resident of this state or the privilege of a nonresident to drive a motor vehicle in this state upon receiving notice of the conviction of the person in another state of an offense in that state which, if committed in this state, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license of an operator or chauffeur.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-13

; P.L. 1959, (s. s.), ch. 190, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204 § 1.

31-11-4.
Seizure of license in possession of unauthorized person.

The license certificate issued under chapter 10 of this title is nontransferable, and if found in the possession of any person other than the licensee may be seized immediately by any proper officer and shall be returned by the officer immediately to the division of motor vehicles. The seized license certificate shall immediately expire.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-16

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-4

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-5.
Abstracts of court records — Recommendations of judge.

A full record shall be kept by every court in this state of every case in which a person is charged with violation of any provision of this title, or any act relative to motor vehicles, or to the operation of the vehicles. An abstract of the record shall be sent by the court to the division of motor vehicles within ten (10) days of the time when the case is disposed of. The abstract shall be made upon forms prepared by the division of motor vehicles and shall include all necessary information as to the parties to the cause, the nature of the offense, the date of the hearing, the plea, the decision, the judgment, and the result, and every abstract shall be certified by the clerk of the court. The division of motor vehicles shall keep the records and they shall be open to the public inspection during the business hours of the division of motor vehicles. The judge of any court in the state may, in his or her discretion, or upon the request of the division of motor vehicles or its agents, furnish to the division of motor vehicles the details of cases which have been heard before the court; and the judge may make an order to the division of motor vehicles as to the suspension of the license of the defendant in cases as he or she may deem necessary. The order shall be binding on the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-14

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-5

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 494, § 3.

31-11-6.
Offenses resulting in mandatory revocation of license.

The license of any chauffeur or operator shall be immediately revoked upon receipt by the division of motor vehicles of a record of the operator’s or chauffeur’s final conviction for any of the following offenses and the term of revocation shall be for the periods enumerated:

Manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, or operating so as to endanger resulting in death, three (3) years;

Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of a narcotic drug as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, which renders him or her incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle, one year;

Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, the period of time, if any, as may be ordered in the final sentence imposed by a court having jurisdiction to impose the sentence;

Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used, eighteen (18) months;

Failure to stop and render aid as required under the laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death or personal injury of another, two (2) years;

Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement under oath to the division of motor vehicles under any other law relating to the ownership or operation of motor vehicles, two (2) years;

Conviction, or forfeiture of bail not vacated, upon three (3) charges of reckless driving committed within a period of twelve (12) months, three (3) years;

Conviction of altered or fraudulent license used to purchase or attempt to purchase alcoholic beverages, three (3) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-15

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-6

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 321, § 2.

31-11-7.
Authority of division of motor vehicles to suspend license.

The division of motor vehicles is authorized to suspend the license of an operator or chauffeur without preliminary hearing upon a showing by its records or other sufficient evidence that the licensee:

Has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction to have:

Committed an offense for which mandatory revocation or suspension of license is required upon conviction or adjudication;

Committed with such frequency of offenses against traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles as to indicate a disrespect for traffic laws and a disregard for the safety of other persons on the highways;

Been a reckless or negligent driver of a motor vehicle;

Permitted an unlawful or fraudulent use of a license;

Committed an offense in another state which, if committed in this state, would be grounds for suspension or revocation;

Committed any offense enumerated in §

31-9-1

;

Is the subject of an order issued pursuant to §

14-1-67

; or

Poses an imminent safety risk to the general public as determined by the application of objectively ascertainable standards.

Except for paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection, the suspension shall be for any length of time, not exceeding one year, that the division of motor vehicles shall determine is necessary in order to protect public safety based upon its findings of the circumstances under which the offense was committed, the likelihood of recurrence, and the deterrent effect that might reasonably be expected to result from the hardship a suspension or prospective suspension would entail. Any license suspended pursuant to paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection shall be for the length of time set forth in the court order.

Upon suspending the license of any person as authorized by subsection (a) of this section, the division of motor vehicles shall immediately notify the licensee in writing of the factual and legal basis for the suspension, the procedure for requesting a hearing, and the rights afforded the individual pursuant to subsections (d) — (f) of this section. When physical or mental fitness is the basis for the suspension determination, the notice shall reference the specific functional standard promulgated pursuant to §

31-10-44(b)

, which was relied upon by the division of motor vehicles. Upon his or her request the division of motor vehicles shall afford the licensee an opportunity for a hearing as early as practical and no later than twenty (20) days after receipt of the request.

Except as authorized in subsection (a) of this section, whenever the division of motor vehicles proposes to suspend the license of any person, the division of motor vehicles shall afford a hearing to the licensee prior to suspending the person’s license. When a licensee requests a hearing, no action to suspend his or her license shall be taken until a hearing decision has been rendered in accordance with subsections (d) — (f) of this section. The division of motor vehicles shall notify the licensee in writing of the factual and legal basis for the proposed suspension, the procedure for requesting a hearing, and the rights afforded the individual pursuant to subsections (d) — (f) of this section. When physical or mental fitness is the basis for the suspension recommendation, the notice shall reference the specific functional standard promulgated pursuant to §

31-10-44(b)

, which was relied upon by the division of motor vehicles.

The division of motor vehicles shall ensure that the hearing procedures afforded pursuant to subsection (b) and (c) of this section provide for: (1) an in person hearing before an impartial decision-maker; (2) the opportunity to compel the production of documents and witnesses, including members of the division of motor vehicles ’s Medical Advisory Board; (3) the opportunity to confront and cross-examine witnesses; (4) access to all of the evidence upon which the division of motor vehicles relied in making its determination to suspend; and (5) the right to present any and all relevant evidence including the right to obtain and present the results of a recently administered road test. During any hearing, the division of motor vehicles shall bear the burden of proof as to the existence of the grounds for the suspension. The division of motor vehicles shall further ensure that during a hearing to determine the physical or mental fitness of a licensee, proof of the lack of physical or mental fitness shall be by clear and convincing evidence. The presumption of inability to operate a motor vehicle with safety established by the functional standards promulgated pursuant to §

31-10-44(b)

, shall be rebuttable by evidence that notwithstanding an individual’s functional limitation, he or she is able to safely operate a motor vehicle.

For the purpose of the hearing procedures described in subsection (d) of this section, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or his or her duly authorized agent may administer oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books and papers, and may require a reexamination of the licensee.

After the hearing conducted pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the division of motor vehicles shall issue a written decision based solely on the evidence adduced at the hearing and containing the legal and factual basis for the determination. The division of motor vehicles may either rescind its order of suspension, determine suspension is not warranted; may continue, modify, or extend the suspension of the license; or may revoke the license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 6; G.L. 1956, §§

31-11-17

,

31-11-21

; P.L. 1959 (s.s.), ch. 190, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-7

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 196, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 494, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 89, § 4.

31-11-8.
Recommendation of court — Violation of § 31-27-4.

The division of motor vehicles shall suspend or revoke the license of a juvenile to operate a motor vehicle whenever the family court shall recommend the suspension or revocation, for any period of time as shall be recommended by the family court.

The license of any chauffeur or operator of a motor vehicle shall be suspended by the division of motor vehicles for a period fixed by any court of the state, not exceeding six (6) months, after final conviction for willfully evading or attempting to evade an order to stop by a uniformed police officer operating a marked police vehicle, as provided in §

31-27-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959 (s.s.), ch. 190, § 8; G.L. 1956, § 31-11-27; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-8

; P.L. 1972, ch. 247, § 1.

31-11-9.
Reexamination of licensees.

The division of motor vehicles, having good cause to believe that a licensed operator or chauffeur is incompetent or otherwise not qualified to be licensed, may upon written notice of at least five (5) days to the licensee require him or her to submit to an examination. Upon the conclusion of the examination the division of motor vehicles shall take action as may be appropriate and may suspend or revoke the license of the person or permit him or her to retain the license, or may issue a license subject to restrictions as permitted under §

31-10-28

. Refusal or neglect of the licensee to submit to the examination shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of his or her license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-22

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-9

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-10.
Reinstatement after revocation or suspension.

Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been revoked or suspended shall not be entitled to have a license or privilege renewed or restored unless the revocation or suspension was for a cause which has been removed. After the expiration of the term of the revocation or suspension he or she may apply to be restored to his or her right to drive, but the division of motor vehicles shall not grant the application unless and until it is satisfied after investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe to license him or her to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways and it has received a reinstatement fee of one hundred and fifty dollars ($150.00). The reinstatement fee and assessment fee shall not be required by any person whose license was suspended on the basis of physical or mental fitness and who has later been declared competent to operate a motor vehicle.

Any person whose license has been suspended on the basis of physical or mental fitness shall have the right to request review at any time of the suspension determination in accordance with the hearing procedures of §

31-11-7(d)

— (f).

If the license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways has been revoked or suspended as a result of a violation of §§

31-27-2

,

31-27-2

.1,

31-27-2.2

or

31-27-2.6

the reinstatement fee shall be three hundred and fifty ($350.00) dollars.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 229, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 494, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 334, § 1: P.L. 1990, ch. 322, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 284, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 134, § 18; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 89, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 3.

31-11-11.
Return of license certificate.

Upon the cancellation, suspension, or revocation of any license issued under chapter 10 of this title, the license shall be and become invalid for any purposes whatsoever and the license certificate shall be returned immediately to the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-19

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-11

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-12.
Operation under foreign license during suspension or revocation in this state prohibited.

Any resident or nonresident whose operator’s or chauffeur’s license, or right or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state, has been suspended or revoked as provided in this chapter, shall not operate a motor vehicle in this state under a license, permit, or registration certificate issued by any other jurisdiction or otherwise during or after the suspension or revocation until he or she has been restored to the right to drive as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 9; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-24

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-12

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-13.
Failure to surrender license certificate.

If any person whose license has been cancelled, suspended, or revoked neglects or refuses to surrender the license certificate to the division of motor vehicles immediately upon demand by it or by any of its authorized agents, the person, in addition to being subject to the other penalties provided by this title, shall thereafter be disqualified from receiving any license to operate until the license certificate is returned to the division of motor vehicles or a reasonable explanation of the circumstances is given to the division of motor vehicles. In the absence of a reasonable explanation, the person shall be disqualified from receiving a license to operate motor vehicles under the provisions of chapter 10 of this title for a period of thirty (30) days in addition to the period of the suspension or revocation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-20

; P.L. 1959 (s.s.), ch. 190, § 6; G.L. 1956, § 32-11-13; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-14.
Retention of suspended, cancelled, or revoked license — Seizure by peace officer.

The division of motor vehicles upon suspending, canceling, or revoking a license shall require that the license be surrendered to and be retained by the division of motor vehicles. At the end of the period of suspension the license so surrendered may be returned to the licensee in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If any person shall fail to return to the division of motor vehicles the license as required by the division of motor vehicles, the division of motor vehicles shall immediately direct any peace officer to secure possession of the license and to return it to the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 8; P.L. 1954, ch. 3277, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-23

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-14

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-15.
Appeal from administrator’s order.

Any person aggrieved by any order of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may appeal that order to the sixth division of the district court by filing, within ten (10) days from the date of the notice to that person of the issuance of the order, a petition in that court stating the grounds upon which the appeal is taken. Upon the filing of the petition and tendering a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) filing fee, the court shall cause thirty (30) days’ notice of the pendency of the hearing to be given to the division of motor vehicles by serving the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, in the manner in which subpoenas in equity are served, with a certified copy of the petition. The petition shall follow the course of equity so far as it is applicable. Upon hearing this petition the court may review the evidence taken at a hearing, investigator’s reports, or other information upon which the administrator’s action was taken, and may in its discretion, affirm, or overrule or modify the order of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles. However, the taking of the appeal shall not operate as a stay of the order of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles from which the appeal is taken, and the order shall remain in full force and effect during the pendency of the appeal. A party aggrieved by a final order of the court may seek appellate review of the order pursuant to the procedures set forth in §

42-35-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 16, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-15

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-15

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 14; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 11; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 13.

31-11-16.
Unlawful use of license.

It is a civil violation for any person:

To display, or cause or permit to be displayed, or have in his or her possession any cancelled, revoked, suspended, fictitious, or fraudulently altered operator’s or chauffeur’s license;

To lend his or her operator’s or chauffeur’s license to any other person or knowingly permit the use of it by another;

To display or represent as one’s own any operator’s or chauffeur’s license not issued to him or her;

To fail or refuse to surrender to the division of motor vehicles upon its lawful demand any operator’s or chauffeur’s license which has been suspended, revoked, or cancelled;

To use a false or fictitious name in any application for an operator’s or chauffeur’s license or to knowingly make a false statement or to knowingly conceal a material fact or otherwise commit a fraud in any such application;

To permit any unlawful use of an operator’s or chauffeur’s license issued to him or her; or

To do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required by this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-1

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-16

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 5.

31-11-17.
False swearing.

Any person who makes any false affidavit, or knowingly swears or affirms falsely to any matter or thing required by the terms of this title to be sworn to or affirmed, is guilty of perjury, and upon conviction shall be punishable by fine or imprisonment as applicable to other perjuries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-2

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-17

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-18.
Driving after denial, suspension, or revocation of license. [Effective until January 1, 2023.]

Any person who drives a motor vehicle on any highway of this state who never applied for a license, or who drives after his or her application for a license has been refused, or after his or her license has expired, or who otherwise drives without a license, or at a time when his or her license to operate is suspended, revoked, or cancelled, for reasons other than those provided for in §

31-11-18.1

, may be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon a first violation under this section, a civil penalty of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), shall be imposed. For the second violation, a civil penalty of not less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), may be imposed.

Any person convicted of a third or a subsequent violation of subsection (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and may, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, be imprisoned for a term not exceeding ninety (90) days, fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both. Additionally, the sentencing judge may suspend the person’s license for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), any person driving after his or her license has expired shall be issued a summons to appear in district court not fewer than ten (10) days after the issuance of the summons, and shall not be taken into custody based solely on this charge absent a warrant. Any person who shall cause his or her expired license to be reinstated by the division of motor vehicles within ten (10) days after issuance of the summons may present proof of reinstatement at the headquarters of the charging police department. Presentation of proof of reinstatement within ten (10) days after the issuance of the summons shall cause the summons to be voided and shall otherwise constitute a complete defense to the charge of driving after expiration of license and a bar to prosecution for that charge. Any convictions under subsection (c) shall be expunged pursuant to the provisions of chapter 1.3 of title 12. For the purposes of this subsection, each of the several state police barracks shall be considered as a separate police headquarters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-3

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-18

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 229, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 646, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 446, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 134, § 1.

31-11-18.
Driving after denial, suspension, or revocation of license. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Any person who drives a motor vehicle on any highway of this state who never applied for a license, or who drives after his or her application for a license has been refused, or after his or her license has expired, or who otherwise drives without a license, or at a time when his or her license to operate is suspended, revoked, or cancelled, for reasons other than those provided for in §

31-11-18.1

, shall be subject to penalties and sanctions set forth in this section.

Upon a first violation under this section, a civil penalty of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) shall be imposed. For the second violation, a civil penalty of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) shall be imposed. For a third violation, a civil penalty of not more than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) shall be imposed. All violations under this subsection shall be heard in the traffic tribunal.

Any person convicted of a fourth or a subsequent violation of subsection (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and may, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, be imprisoned for a term not exceeding one year, fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Additionally, the sentencing judge may suspend the person’s license for a period not to exceed one year. All violations under this subsection shall be heard in the district court.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any person driving after his or her license has expired shall be issued a summons to appear in the traffic tribunal not fewer than ten (10) days after the issuance of the summons, and shall not be taken into custody based solely on this charge absent a warrant. Any person who shall cause his or her expired license to be reinstated by the division of motor vehicles within ten (10) days after issuance of the summons may present proof of reinstatement at the headquarters of the charging police department. Presentation of proof of reinstatement within ten (10) days after the issuance of the summons shall cause the summons to be voided and shall otherwise constitute a complete defense to the charge of driving after expiration of license and a bar to prosecution for that charge. Any convictions under subsection (c) shall be expunged pursuant to the provisions of chapter 1.3 of title 12. For the purposes of this subsection, each of the several state police barracks shall be considered as a separate police headquarters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-3

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-18

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 229, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 646, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 446, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 336, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 337, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

31-11-18.1.
Driving after denial, revocation, or suspension for certain violations.

Any person who drives a motor vehicle on any highway of this state who never applied for a license or who drives after his or her application for a license has been refused, or after his or her license has expired or who otherwise drives without a license or at a time when his or her license to operate is suspended, revoked, or cancelled, for: (1) operating under the influence of a narcotic drug or intoxicating liquor; (2) refusing to submit to a chemical test; reckless driving; (3) manslaughter from the operation of a motor vehicle or operating so as to endanger resulting in death; or (4) three (3) moving violations within a one-year period; shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for the first and second offenses and shall be deemed guilty of a felony for the third or subsequent offenses.

The division of motor vehicles upon receiving a record of the conviction of any person upon a charge of driving a motor vehicle while the license of the person was suspended, for reasons set forth in this section shall suspend the person’s license or deny the person’s application for any length of time that it shall deem proper but in no case less than an additional three (3) months. Upon receiving a record of conviction of a second violation of driving a motor vehicle while the license of that person was suspended for reasons set forth in this section, the division of motor vehicles shall suspend the person’s license or deny the person’s application for any length of time that it shall deem proper but in no case less than an additional six (6) months. Any subsequent conviction shall result in license revocation. Upon receiving a record of the conviction of any person upon a charge of driving after his or her application for a license had been refused, or after his or her license had been revoked or cancelled for reasons set forth in this section, the division of motor vehicles shall not issue a new license for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license.

Upon a first conviction under this section a mandatory fine of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be imposed, and if the person was driving after his or her application for a license had been refused, or at a time when his or her license to operate was suspended, revoked, or cancelled for operating under the influence of a controlled substance or intoxicating liquor, or his or her refusal to submit to a chemical test, reckless driving, manslaughter from the operation of a motor vehicle, or operation so as to endanger, death resulting, the person shall be imprisoned for a minimum of ten (10) days.

A mandatory fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for a second conviction under this section within a five (5) year period shall be imposed, and if the person was driving after his or her application for a license had been refused, or at a time when his or her license to operate was suspended, revoked, or cancelled for operating under the influence of a controlled substance or intoxicating liquor or his or her refusal to submit to a chemical test, reckless driving, manslaughter from the operation of a motor vehicle, or operation so as to endanger, death resulting, the person shall be imprisoned for a minimum of six (6) months to one year.

For any subsequent conviction within a five (5) year period, a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be imposed and the person may be imprisoned for up to one year or be required to participate in a public service program designated and approved by the court. If the person was driving after his or her application for a license had been refused or at a time when his or her license to operate was suspended, revoked, or cancelled for: (i) operating under the influence of a controlled substance or intoxicating liquor; (ii) his or her refusal to submit to a chemical test; (iii) reckless driving; (iv) manslaughter from the operation of a motor vehicle; or (v) operating so as to endanger, death resulting; the person shall be imprisoned for a minimum of one year. Jurisdiction for violations of this section is given to the district court and the court shall have full authority to impose any sentence authorized for violations of this section.

No fines, suspensions, treatment, or jail provided for under this section can be suspended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 323, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 229, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 102, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 318, § 2.

31-11-19.
Permitting child under the age of 16 to drive.

No person shall cause or knowingly permit his or her child or ward under the age of sixteen (16) years to drive a motor vehicle upon any highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-4

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-19

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-20.
Permitting unauthorized person to drive prohibited.

No person shall authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle owned by him or her or under his or her control to be driven upon any highway by any person who is not authorized under this title or in violation of any of the provisions of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-5

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-20

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-21.
Employment of unlicensed chauffeur prohibited.

No person shall employ as a chauffeur of a motor vehicle any person not then licensed as provided in chapter 10 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-6

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-21

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-21.1.
Penalty for employing of unlicensed/unauthorized operator.

The registered owner of any school bus used for the transportation of school children shall be responsible for insuring that any person operating the school bus is licensed as provided in chapter 10 of this title, and the failure of any driver to have the proper licenses and certificates shall result in a fine against the registered owner of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each day the driver operates a school bus without the licenses and/or certificates. This fine shall be administered by the traffic tribunal. Nothing in this section shall preclude any civil or criminal penalty against the unlicensed operator of the school bus.

The registered owner of any school bus used for the transportation of school children shall obtain from the division of motor vehicles every year a certificate indicating that the operators of any school bus registered to the registered owner is in full compliance with all the requirements of this title.

The division of motor vehicles shall reply to any request made by any school bus owner in writing within ten (10) working days of the receipt of the request.

The division of motor vehicles shall prepare forms for the filing of requests and answers to them.

Licenses issued to school bus operators shall bear the date of the most recent division of motor vehicles check on its face.

The division of motor vehicles shall fix a fee for the providing of the information required by this section, which fee shall be paid by the registered owner making the request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 413, § 3.

31-11-22.
Rental to unauthorized person prohibited.

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to any other person unless the latter person is then duly licensed under this title or, in the case of a nonresident, then duly licensed under the laws of the state or country of his or her residence, except a nonresident whose home state or country does not require that an operator be licensed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-7

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-22

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-23.
Inspection of license of person to whom vehicle rented required.

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to another until he or she has inspected the operator’s or chauffeur’s license of the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented, and compared and verified the signature on it with the signature of the person written in his or her presence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-8

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-23

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-24.
Records of rentals.

Every person renting a motor vehicle to another shall keep a record of the registration number of the motor vehicle so rented, the name and address of the person to whom the vehicle is rented, the number of the license of the latter person, and the date and place when and where the license was issued. The record shall be open to inspection by any police officer or employee of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 17, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-9

; G.L. 1956, §

31-11-24

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 1.

31-11-25.
Suspension for failure to pay fine.

The division of motor vehicles shall suspend the license of a person to operate a motor vehicle upon certification of the clerk of any county of the superior court or any supervising deputy clerk of the district court or a clerk of the traffic tribunal that the person has failed to pay fines or costs imposed for a violation of any provision of this title within the time period provided for payment by the court, or has failed to make satisfactory arrangements with the court for payment of the fines or costs; provided, however, the person shall first be entitled to request an ability to pay hearing by filing a request with the court that imposed the fines or costs.

The suspension shall remain in force until all fines or costs are paid to the respective court or satisfactory arrangements have been made with the court for payment of the fines or costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 236, § 1.